Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-312
Levees; dikes; report of engineer; filing; notice of hearing.

As soon as the report of the engineer is filed with the county clerk, it shall be the duty of the county clerk to give notice of the filing thereof by publication for three consecutive weeks in some weekly newspaper published in the county where the improvement is to be made, and state therein the proposed location where the improvement is to be made and the time set for the hearing thereon, of which all persons interested shall take notice. The date for said hearing shall not be more than six weeks from the date of the first publication.

Laws 1921, c. 269, § 4, p. 895;

C.S.1922, § 1029;

C.S.1929, § 26-723;

R.S.1943, § 23-312.